Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.215, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Model program. The commissioner of education, in consultation with the commissioners of health and human services, local district and school health education specialists, and other qualified experts, shall identify one or more model programs that may be used to educate middle school and high school students on the health effects on children and adolescents of cannabis use and substance use, including but not limited to the use of fentanyl or mixtures containing fentanyl, consistent with local standards as required in section 120B.021, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (6), for elementary and secondary school students. The commissioner must publish a list of model programs that include written materials, resources, and training for instructors by June 1, 2025. A model program identified by the commissioner must be medically accurate, age and developmentally appropriate, culturally inclusive, and grounded in science, and must address: (1) the physical and mental health effects of cannabis use and substance use by children, adolescents, and persons under 25 years of age, including effects on the developing brains of children, adolescents, and persons under 25 years of age; (2) unsafe or unhealthy behaviors associated with cannabis use and substance use; (3) signs of substance use disorders; (4) treatment options; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) healthy coping strategies for children and adolescentsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) overdose recognition, prevention, and response. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end